dng-fst.dng.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>
%<np%>
%<vblex%>
%<adj%>
%<adv%>
%<prn%>
%<num%>
%<cnjcoo%>
%<cnjsub%>
%<post%>
%<part%>
%<cop%>
%<ij%>
%<cls%>

%<pers%>
%<dem%>
%<itg%>
%<p1%>
%<p2%>
%<p3%>
%<sg%>
%<pl%>
%<incl%>
%<px%>

%<an%>
%<nn%>

%<t1%>
%<t2%>
%<t3%>

%<pst%>
%<prog%>
%<fut%>
%<exp%>

%<comp%>
%<sup%>
%<neg%>

%<loc%>

%<gen%>
%<advl%>

%>
%+



LEXICON Root

Nouns ;
NounsExtra ;
SalmiDict ;
NounsWik ;
VerbsWik ;
AdjWik ;
AdvWik ;
NumWik ;
PropWik ;
IjWik ;
CorpusProp ;
CorpusNoun ;
ProperNouns ;
Verbs ;
VerbsExtra ;
Adjectives ;
AdjExtra ;
Adverbs ;
Negators ;
Pronouns ;
Numerals ;
Classifiers ;
Conjunctions ;
Postpositions ;
LocSalmi ;
NounsSalmi ;
VerbsSalmi ;
AdjSalmi ;
CorpusProp2 ;
CorpusNoun2 ;
CorpusVerb2 ;
CorpusNoun3 ;
CorpusProp3 ;
CorpusAdv3 ;
CorpusVerb3 ;
CorpusNoun4 ;
CorpusMisc4 ;
NounsYan ;
NounsAnYan ;
VerbsYan ;
AdjYan ;
AdvYan ;
NumYan ;
NounsYan2 ;
NounsAnYan2 ;
VerbsYan2 ;
AdjYan2 ;
AdvYan2 ;
NounsYan3 ;
NounsAnYan3 ;
VerbsYan3 ;
AdjYan3 ;
YanZ_adj_t1 ;
YanZ_adj_t2 ;
YanZ_adj_t3 ;
YanZ_adv_t1 ;
YanZ_adv_t2 ;
YanZ_n_t1 ;
YanZ_n_t2 ;
YanZ_n_t3 ;
YanZ_nan_t1 ;
YanZ_nan_t2 ;
YanZ_nan_t3 ;
YanZ_vblex_t1 ;
YanZ_vblex_t2 ;
YanZ_vblex_t3 ;
Yan5_adj_t1 ;
Yan5_adj_t2 ;
Yan5_adj_t3 ;
Yan5_adv_t1 ;
Yan5_adv_t2 ;
NamesPlace ;
NamesPerson ;
NamesPeople ;
NamesLoan ;
NamesExtra ;
NamesTail ;
NamesFinal ;
NamesReligion ;
Core_t1_NNN ;
Core_t2_NNN ;
Core_t3_NNN ;
Yan5_adv_t3 ;
Yan5_n_t1 ;
Yan5_n_t2 ;
Yan5_n_t3 ;
Yan5_nan_t1 ;
Yan5_nan_t2 ;
Yan5_nan_t3 ;
Yan5_vblex_t1 ;
Yan5_vblex_t2 ;
Yan5_vblex_t3 ;
Particles ;
Interjections ;

PronDial ;
CopulaDial ;
VerbDial ;
ClsDial ;



LEXICON PrnPossSlot
        # ;
%<px%>:%+ди  # ;

LEXICON PrnDemEnd
%<prn%>%<dem%>:  # ;

LEXICON PrnItgEnd
%<prn%>%<itg%>:  # ;

LEXICON Cop
%<cop%>:  # ;

LEXICON N-AN
%<n%>%<an%>:  N-AN-Num ;

LEXICON N-AN-Num
%<sg%>:        NounEnd ;
%<pl%>:%>му    NounEnd ;

LEXICON N-NN
%<n%>%<nn%>:  NounEnd ;

LEXICON NounEnd
                # ;
%<loc%>:%+ни    # ;
%<loc%>:%+шон   # ;
%<prog%>:%+дини # ;
%<prog%>:%+ди   # ;
%<pst%>:%+ли    # ;
%<fut%>:%+ни    # ;

LEXICON Np
%<np%>:  NpEnd ;

LEXICON NpEnd
                # ;
%<gen%>:%+ди    # ;
%<pl%>:%+му     # ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:%+му%+ди   # ;
%<sg%>:%+жын    # ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:%+жын%+ди   # ;
%<pl%>:%+жын%+му  # ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:%+жын%+му%+ди  # ;

LEXICON V
%<vblex%>:  VAspSlot ;

LEXICON VAspSlot
              # ;
%<pst%>:%+ли      # ;
%<prog%>:%+дини   # ;
%<prog%>:%+ди     # ;
%<fut%>:%+ни      # ;
%<exp%>:%+гуә     # ;

LEXICON Adj
%<adj%>:  AdjDeg ;

LEXICON AdjDeg
              # ;
%<comp%>:%+щер   # ;
%<sup%>:%+дихын  # ;
%<prog%>:%+дини   # ;
%<prog%>:%+ди     # ;

LEXICON Adv
%<adv%>:  # ;

LEXICON Neg
%<neg%>:  # ;

LEXICON Num
%<num%>:  NumCls ;

LEXICON NumCls
        # ;
%<cls%>:%>гә   # ;
%<cls%>:%>ба   # ;
%<cls%>:%>җон  # ;
%<cls%>:%>тё   # ;
%<cls%>:%>бын  # ;

LEXICON Cls
%<cls%>:  # ;

LEXICON Post
%<post%>:  # ;

LEXICON Loc
%<loc%>:  LocDi ;

LEXICON LocDi
        # ;
%<gen%>:%+ди  # ;

LEXICON CnjCoo
%<cnjcoo%>:  # ;

LEXICON CnjSub
%<cnjsub%>:  # ;

LEXICON PartBa
%<part%>:  # ;

LEXICON PartGi
%<post%>:  # ;

LEXICON PartGen
%<part%>%<gen%>:  # ;

LEXICON PartLi
%<part%>%<pst%>:  # ;

LEXICON PartNi
%<part%>:  # ;

LEXICON Ij
%<ij%>:  # ;
